Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.901

Establishment of administrative units to coordinate energy education or energy program delivery programs.

In addition to the powers and duties transferred, Washington State University shall have the authority to establish administrative units as may be necessary to coordinate either energy education or energy program delivery programs, or both, and to revise, restructure, redirect, or eliminate programs transferred to Washington State University based on available funding or to better serve the people and businesses of Washington state.

[ 1996 c 186 s 202.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 186: See notes following RCW 43.330.904.